Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6743
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which shall ensure proper storage, handling, and disposal of medication in facilities and schools as defined in section 71-6721.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 37;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 667.